Hawaii, session 2026, GM1155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that vacancy rates across
government agencies, particularly in the executive department,
persist at elevated levels. These vacancies are fueled in part
by Hawaii's high cost of living and lack of sufficient
affordable housing, which drives many residents to leave for
less expensive jurisdictions on the mainland to pursue their
dream of homeownership and the stability and financial security
it brings. This housing crisis disproportionately affects
younger employees, lower- and middle-wage earners, and renters,
groups that form a large portion of the state workforce and
represent the future of public service.
National surveys confirm that the down payment, ordinarily
required to qualify for a mortgage or to avoid the added expense
of mortgage insurance, is the single greatest barrier to
homeownership. According to a 2024 Gallup report, sixty-eight
per cent of renters cite affordability and insufficient savings
for a down payment as the main reason why they remain renters.
2026-1953 HB2315 SDl SMA.docx
iiiMinmiiiiiHiigiliH

Page 2
H.B. NO.
A 2024 Bankrate survey likewise found that more than half of
aspiring homeowners cannot save for a down payment because of
high living costs and low income, with one in five believing
they may never save enough.
The legislature further finds that a potential resource for
state employees to fund these down payments may exist in the
earned vacation benefits held by each individual state employee.
Under the terms of current collective bargaining agreements, a
typical full-time employee for the State accrues fourteen hours
of vacation leave per month and can carry up to a balance of
seven hundred twenty hours from year-to-year. Upon a separation
of service, because of retirement or other break of service
lasting more than seven calendar days without rehire, the
employee is paid the value of the accumulated vacation leave as
a lump sum equal to the amount of compensation the employee
would be entitled or allowed if the vacation leave was used in
the normal manner. These lump sum payments, especially for
separating employees with high vacation accrual balances, can be
worth tens of thousands of dollars. While employees who
separate to find other employment or who retire will receive the
lump sum payment, employees who continuously work for the State
2026-1953 HB2315 SDl SMA.docx 2

Page 3
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
without a break in service are not permitted to "cash out" their
accrued vacation balances.
The legislature also finds that establishing a pilot
program to allow state employees to liquidate a portion of their
earned and accrued vacation benefits and apply the disbursement
to the down payment of a personal primary residence without the
necessity of a separation of service will allow the State to
increase the recruitment and retention of employees. The
legislature additionally finds that a project of this nature
aligns with the State's broader housing and workforce
development policies by addressing a primary barrier to
homeownership without creating new subsidies or pension
liabilities, and will support a more stable workforce, lower
turnover costs, and strengthen local families and neighborhoods.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize the
department of health to establish a three-year vacation payout
pilot program to liquidate a portion of department of health
employees' earned and accrued vacation benefits and apply the
disbursement to the down payment of a personal primary residence
without the necessity of a separation of service.
2026-1953 HB2315 SDl SMA.docx 3
lillHilMMIliillllim

Page 4
H.B. NO.
SECTION 2. (a) The department of health may establish a
vacation payout pilot program to permit department of health
employees to use earned vacation leave benefits to fund the down
payment of a personal primary residence in the State.
(b) A department of health employee shall be eligible to
participate in the pilot program if the employee, at a minimum:
(1) Is a purchaser of residential real property in the
State who:
(A) Is a citizen of the United States;
(B) Is a bona fide resident of the State;
(C) Is at least eighteen years of age; and
(D) Does not personally, or, if the employee is
married, whose spouse does not own any interest
in a primary residence within or without the
State and neither the employee nor the employee's
spouse has owned a primary residence within three
years immediately before the application to
participate in the vacation payout pilot program;
(2) Is a permanent full or part-time employee with the
department of health in good standing. For purposes
of this paragraph, "good standing" means the employee:
2026-1953 HB2315 SDl SMA.docx
iiiMHinHiiiiiiDiiiniii

Page 5
H.B. NO. |’i
(A) Is not serving an initial or new probationary
period;
(B) Is not subject to suspension, pending
disciplinary action, or termination proceedings
at the time of application;
(C) Has received at least a satisfactory rating on
the most recent performance evaluation; and
(D) Is not the subject of a pending investigation or
substantiated investigation that may reasonably
lead to discipline;
(3) Has been employed by the department of health for at
least one year at the time of the application;
(4) Submits an affidavit stating that the employee;
(A) Will occupy the purchased property as their
primary residence within ninety days of the deed
being recorded;
(B) Intends to maintain occupancy in the purchased
property for at least three years; and
(C) Is not the child, spouse, or parent of the seller
of the purchased property; and
2026-1953 HB2315 SDl SMA.docx 5

Page 6
H.B. NO.
(5) Is not acting as the agent of any other person or
entity in purchasing the mortgaged property.
(c) The department of health shall establish procedures to
receive, review, and adjudicate applications requesting vacation
pay out as part of the pilot program.
(d) Funds shall be paid on behalf of the employee directly
to the escrow, title company, or company lender at closing and
not as a lump-sum to the employee, subject to any withholdings
required by state and federal law.
(e) The vacation payout shall only include vacation leave
earned at the time of the application and shall not include any
future unearned vacation leave.
(f) The minimum vacation leave payout shall be no less
than $5,000 and the maximum payout shall be no more than $50,000
per eligible employee, inclusive of any taxes withheld, subject
to the availability of funds within the department of health's
budget.
(g) The department of health shall submit a report of its
findings and recommendations, including any proposed
legislation, regarding the pilot program to the legislature no
later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular
2026-1953 HB2315 SDl SMA.docx

Page 7
H.B. NO.
sessions of 2027, 2028, and 2029. The report submitted prior to
the convening of the regular session of 2028 shall make a
recommendation as to whether the pilot program should be
extended.
(h) For purposes of this Act, "primary residence" means a
dwelling unit where the owner lives for the majority of the year
and intends to use as their main permanent home.
SECTION 3. If any provision of this Act, or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Act are severable.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval,
and shall be repealed on June 30, 2029.
2026-1953 HB2315 SDl SMA.docx 7

H.B. NO. 2315
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
APPROVED this 28th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2315, HD 1, SD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 24, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B.No. 2315, H.D. 1,S.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 10,2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
3649